Hawaii, session 2026, GM1352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the state rent
2 supplement program for kupuna administered by the Hawaii public
3 housing authority has helped prevent some of the State's
4 vulnerable elderly residents from facing eviction and becoming
5 homeless. In total, the program has provided about three
6 hundred at-risk kupuna with monthly rental assistance of less
7 than $500 per month. In 2024, the legislature funded the
8 program with $1,000,000 and in 2025, the legislature extended
9 the program's sunset date from 2026 to 2028. The legislature
10 believes that the program should now be made permanent.
11 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to make the state
12 rent supplement program for kupuna permanent.
13 SECTION 2. Act 98, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended
14 by Act 282, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending
15 section 6 to read as follows:
16 "SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2023[7-
17 and shatl-feo- rcpeal-Gd ' -on -Juno -30,—2-05^] . "
2026-2351 SB2866 CDl SMA-l.docx
NiHinMiiiiiininiiiiiiHiiiiHii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
1 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
2 and stricken.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2351 SB2866 CDl SMA-l.docx
2
nnniiiiBiMniiiniiiiiiiDiHi

S.B. NO. s"
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2866, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
129-26

SB No. 2866, SD1,HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives